North Dakota statutes. TITLE 38 Mining and Gas and Oil Production
CHAPTER 38-14.1 Surface Mining and Reclamation Operations

38-14.1-01.
Declaration of findings and intent.

The legislative assembly finds and declares that:

Many surface coal mining operations may result in disturbances of surface areas that adversely affect the public welfare by diminishing the utility of land for commercial, industrial, residential, cultural, educational, scientific, recreational, agricultural, and forestry purposes, by causing erosion, by polluting the water, by destroying fish and wildlife habitats, by impairing natural beauty, by damaging the property of citizens, by creating hazards dangerous to life and property, by degrading the quality of life in local communities, and by counteracting governmental programs and efforts to conserve soil, water, other natural resources, and cultural resources.

The expansion of coal mining to meet the nation’s energy needs makes even more urgent the establishment of appropriate standards to minimize damage to the environment and to productivity of the soil and to protect the health and safety of the public.

Surface mining and reclamation technology as now developed requires effective and reasonable regulation of surface coal mining operations in accordance with the requirements of this chapter to minimize so far as practicable the adverse social, economic, and environmental effects of such mining operations.

Surface coal mining operations contribute to the economic well-being, security, and general welfare of the state and should be conducted in an environmentally sound manner.

Surface coal mining and reclamation operations should be so conducted as to aid in maintaining and improving the tax base, to provide for the conservation, development, management, and appropriate use of all the natural resources of affected areas for compatible multiple purposes, and to ensure the restoration of affected lands designated for agricultural purposes to the level of productivity equal to or greater than that which existed in the permit area prior to mining.

Warrantless inspections are necessary in this state to ensure effective enforcement of surface coal mining and reclamation operation requirements.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1.

Law Reviews.

An Ecological/Legal Assessment of Mined Land Reclamation Laws, 53 N.D. L. Rev. 359 (1977).

North Dakota’s Surface Mining and Reclamation Law — Will Our Wealth Make Us Poor? 50 N.D. L. Rev. 437.

Surface Coal Mining Law in the Western United States: How Does It Provide for Wildlife, 54 N.D. L. Rev. 337 (1978).

38-14.1-02.
Definitions.

Wherever used or referred to in this chapter, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

“Alluvial valley floors” means the unconsolidated stream-laid deposits holding streams where water availability is sufficient for subirrigation or flood irrigation agricultural activities but does not include upland areas which are generally overlain by a thin veneer of colluvial deposits composed chiefly of sediment from sheet erosion, deposits by unconcentrated runoff or slope wash, together with talus, other mass movement accumulation, and windblown deposits.

“Approximate original contour” means that surface configuration achieved by backfilling and grading an area affected by surface coal mining operations so that the reclaimed area closely resembles the general surface configuration of the land prior to being affected by surface coal mining operations and blends into and complements the surrounding undisturbed land.

“Coal” means a dark-colored compact and earthy organic rock with less than forty percent inorganic components, based on dry material, formed by the accumulation and decomposition of plant material. The term includes consolidated lignitic coal, in both oxidized and nonoxidized forms, having less than eight thousand three hundred British thermal units per pound [453.59 grams], moist and mineral matter free, whether or not the material is enriched in radioactive materials. The term does not include commercial leonardite.

“Commercial leonardite” means a dark-colored, soft, earthy organic rock formed from the oxidation of lignite coal, and is produced from a mine that has as its only function for supply for purposes other than gasification or combustion to generate electricity.

“Commission” means the public service commission, or such other department, bureau, or commission as may lawfully succeed to the powers and duties of that commission. The commission is the state regulatory authority for all purposes relating to the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 [Pub. L. 95-87; 91 Stat. 445 et seq.].

“Extended mining plan” means a written statement setting forth the matters specified in section 38-14.1-15 and covering the estimated life of the surface coal mining operation.

“Final cut” means the last pit created in a surface mining pit sequence.

“Highwall” and “endwall” mean those sides of the pit adjacent to unmined land.

“Imminent danger to the health and safety of the public” means the existence of any condition or practice, or any violation of a permit or other requirement of this chapter in a surface coal mining and reclamation operation, which condition, practice, or violation could reasonably be expected to cause substantial physical harm to persons outside the permit area before such condition, practice, or violation can be abated. A reasonable expectation of death or serious injury before abatement exists if a rational person, subjected to the same conditions or practices giving rise to the peril, would not expose the person’s self to the danger during the time necessary for abatement.

“Operator” means any individual, person, partnership, firm, association, society, joint stock company, company, cooperative, corporation, limited liability company, or other business organization, or any department, agency, or instrumentality of the state, local, or federal government, or any governmental subdivision thereof including any publicly owned utility or publicly owned corporation of the state, local, or federal government, engaged in or controlling a surface coal mining operation. Operator does not include those who remove or intend to remove two hundred fifty tons [226.80 metric tons] or less of coal or commercial leonardite from the earth by coal or commercial leonardite mining within twelve consecutive calendar months in any one location or who remove any coal or commercial leonardite pursuant to reclamation operations under chapter 38-14.2.

“Other minerals” means clay, stone, sand, gravel, metalliferous and nonmetalliferous ores, and any other solid material or substances of commercial value occurring within five hundred feet [152.4 meters] or less of the land surface and which are excavated in solid form from natural deposits on or in the earth, exclusive of coal or commercial leonardite and those minerals which occur naturally in liquid or gaseous form.

“Other suitable strata” means those portions of the overburden determined by the commission to be suitable for meeting the requirements of subsections 2 and 17 of section 38-14.1-24 and based on data submitted by the permit applicant.

“Overburden” means all of the earth and other materials, with the exception of suitable plant growth material, which lie above natural deposits of coal or commercial leonardite and also means such earth and other materials, with the exception of suitable plant growth material, disturbed from their natural state by surface coal or commercial leonardite mining operations.

“Performance bond” means a surety bond, collateral bond, self-bond, deposit, a bond issued under the state surface mining and reclamation bond fund, any alternative form of security approved by the commission, or combination thereof, by which a permittee assures faithful performance of all requirements of this chapter.

“Permit” means a permit to conduct surface coal mining and reclamation operations issued by the commission.

“Permit applicant” means a person or operator applying for a permit.

“Permit area” means the area of land approved by the commission for surface coal mining operations which shall be readily identifiable by appropriate markers on the site.

“Permit renewal” means the extension of the permit term for areas within the boundaries of the initial or existing permit, upon the expiration of the initial or existing permit term.

“Permit revision” means the modification of permit provisions during the term of the permit and includes changes in the mining and reclamation plans, incidental boundary extensions, and the transfer, assignment, or sale of rights granted under the permit.

“Permit term” means a period of time beginning with the date upon which a permit is given for surface coal mining and reclamation operations under the provisions of this chapter, and ending with the expiration of the next succeeding five years plus any renewal of the permit granted under this chapter.

“Permittee” means a person or operator holding a permit.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, firm, association, society, joint stock company, company, cooperative, corporation, limited liability company, or other business organization.

“Pit” means a tract of land, from which overburden, coal, or commercial leonardite, or any combination of overburden, coal, or commercial leonardite has been or is being removed for the purpose of surface coal mining operations.

“Prime farmland” means lands as prescribed by commission regulation that have the soil characteristics and moisture supply needed to produce sustained high yields of adapted crops economically when treated and managed, including management of water, according to modern farming methods. Furthermore, such lands historically have been used for intensive agricultural purposes and are large enough in size to constitute a viable economic unit.

“Prime soils” means those soils that have the required soil characteristics (including slope and moisture supply) needed to produce sustained high yields of adapted crops, as determined by the state conservationist of the United States department of agriculture soil conservation service.

“Reclaimed” or “reclaim” means conditioning areas affected by surface coal mining operations to make them capable of supporting the uses which they were capable of supporting prior to any mining, or higher or better uses, pursuant to subsection 2 of section 38-14.1-24.

“Reclamation plan” means a plan submitted by an applicant for a permit which sets forth a plan for reclamation of the proposed surface coal mining operations pursuant to subsection 2 of section 38-14.1-14.

“Refuse” means all waste material directly connected with the production of coal or commercial leonardite mined by surface coal mining operations.

“Soil amendments” means those materials added by the operator to the replaced overburden or suitable plant growth material, or both, to improve the physical or chemical condition of the soil in its relation to plant growth capability.

“Soil classifier” means a professional soil classifier as defined in subsection 4 of section 43-36-01.

“Soil survey” means the identification and location of all suitable plant growth material within the proposed permit area and an accompanying report that describes, classifies, and interprets for use such materials.

“State program” means the program established by the state of North Dakota in accordance with the requirements of section 503 of the federal Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 [Pub. L. 95-87; 91 Stat. 47030 U.S.C. 1253] to regulate surface coal mining and reclamation operations on lands within the state of North Dakota.

“Suitable plant growth material” means that soil material (normally the A, B, and portions of the C horizons) located within the proposed permit area which, based upon a soil survey, is found by the commission to be the most acceptable as a medium for plant growth when respread on the surface of regraded areas.

“Surface coal mining and reclamation operations” means surface coal mining operations and all activities necessary and incidental to the reclamation of such operations after July 1, 1979.

“Surface coal mining operations” means:

Activities affecting the surface of lands in connection with a surface coal or commercial leonardite mine. Such activities include extraction of coal or commercial leonardite from coal or commercial leonardite refuse piles, excavation for the purpose of obtaining coal or commercial leonardite, including such common methods as contour, strip, auger, box cut, open pit, and area mining, the uses of explosives and blasting, and in situ distillation or retorting, leaching or other chemical or physical processing, and the cleaning, concentrating, or other processing or preparation, and loading of coal or commercial leonardite at or near the minesite, except that such activities do not include coal or commercial leonardite exploration subject to chapter 38-12.1, or the extraction of coal or commercial leonardite incidental to reclamation operations under chapter 38-14.2; and

The areas upon which such activities occur or where such activities disturb the natural land surface. Such areas shall also include any adjacent land the use of which is incidental to any such activities, all adjacent lands affected by the construction of new roads or the improvement or use of existing roads to gain access to the site of such activities and for haulage, and excavations, workings, impoundments, dams, refuse banks, dumps, stockpiles, overburden piles, spoil banks, culm banks, tailings, holes or depressions, repair areas, storage areas, processing areas, shipping areas, and other areas upon which are sited structures, facilities, or other property or materials on the surface, resulting from or incident to such activities.

“Unwarranted failure to comply” means the failure of a permittee to prevent the occurrence of any violation of the permittee’s permit or any requirement of this chapter due to indifference, lack of diligence, or lack of reasonable care, or the failure to abate any violation of such permit or this chapter due to indifference, lack of diligence, or lack of reasonable care.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 1981, ch. 371, § 2; 1991, ch. 392, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2015, ch. 257, § 7, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 7 of chapter 257, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

38-14.1-03.
Powers and duties of the commission.

The commission shall have and may exercise the following powers and duties:

To establish a program to protect society and the environment from the adverse effects of surface coal mining operations.

To assure that surface coal mining operations are so conducted as to protect the environment.

To assure that adequate procedures are undertaken to reclaim surface areas as contemporaneously as possible with the surface coal mining operations.

To assure that surface coal mining operations are not conducted where reclamation as required by this chapter is not feasible.

To assure that appropriate procedures are provided for public participation in the development, revision, and enforcement of regulations, standards, reclamation plans, or programs established by the commission under this chapter.

To encourage the voluntary cooperation of persons or affected groups to achieve the purposes of this chapter.

To encourage and support training, research, experiments, and demonstrations, to utilize the expertise of other state agencies, and to collect and disseminate information relating to surface mining and reclamation of lands and waters affected by surface mining.

To examine and act upon all plans and specifications submitted by the permit applicant for the method of operation, backfilling, grading, and for the reclamation of the area of land affected by the permit applicant’s operation.

To attach conditions to all permits and permit revisions as necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

To issue permits for surface coal mining operations in accordance with the requirements of this chapter and the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 [Pub. L. 95-87; 91 Stat. 445; 30 U.S.C. 1201 et seq.].

To promulgate such regulations as may be necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter and the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 [Pub. L. 95-87; 91 Stat. 445; 30 U.S.C. 1201 et seq.].

To adopt rules consistent with state law in consultation with the state geologist, department of environmental quality, and department of water resources for the protection of the quality and quantity of waters affected by surface coal mining operations.

To promulgate regulations requiring the training, examination, and certification of persons engaged in or directly responsible for blasting or use of explosives in surface coal mining and reclamation operations.

To exercise general supervision and administration and enforcement of this chapter and all regulations and orders promulgated thereunder and all incidental powers necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including the utilization of the powers of other state agencies by delegation to those other state agencies, by cooperative agreement or regulation, certain responsibilities to avoid duplication of effort, to promote the efficient use of personnel, and to assure effective reclamation of surface mined lands in the state of North Dakota.

To make investigations and inspections which may be deemed necessary to ensure compliance with any provision of this chapter. The commission or its authorized representatives, upon presentation of appropriate credentials, shall have the right of entry without a warrant for the purposes of such investigations or inspections.

To issue such orders as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter and enforce the same by all appropriate administrative and judicial procedures.

To hold any hearings and informal conferences necessary for the proper administration of this chapter.

To reclaim, in keeping with this chapter, any land with respect to which a performance bond has been forfeited.

To exercise those additional powers and duties relative to the designation of lands unsuitable for surface coal mining operations granted in section 38-14.1-04.

To take all action necessary and appropriate including the promulgation of regulations for all provisions of this chapter to secure for this state the benefits of and to implement the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 [Pub. L. 95-87; 91 Stat. 445; 30 U.S.C. 1201 et seq.] and similar federal acts.

To advise, consult, and cooperate with other agencies of the state, other states and interstate agencies, and with affected groups, political subdivisions, and industries in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter.

To accept and administer loans and grants from the federal government and from other sources, public or private, for carrying out any functions pursuant to this chapter, which loans and grants may not be expended for other than the purposes for which provided.

To provide by regulation standards and procedures for specific variances to any permittee so long as the permittee affirmatively demonstrates that the requested variance provides equal or greater protection to the environment and to public health and safety and will achieve reclamation consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

To provide by regulation for the conservation and utilization of other minerals found within the permit area during surface coal mining and reclamation operations in consultation with the state geologist and to approve plans for the use of such other minerals outside the permit area so long as the permittee affirmatively demonstrates that such removal is lawful and will provide equal or greater protection to the environment and to public health and safety and will achieve reclamation consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

To exercise the full reach of the state constitutional powers wherever necessary to ensure the protection of the public interest through effective control of surface coal mining operations.

To establish a performance bonding system and an alternative to the performance bonding system which achieve the objectives and purposes of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 1981, ch. 371, § 2; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2017, ch. 199, § 37, effective April 29, 2019; 2021, ch. 488, § 15, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

This section is effective upon the receipt by the legislative council of the certification by the chief of the environmental health section of the state department of health attesting that all necessary federal approvals have been obtained and all necessary federal and other agreements have been amended to ensure the state will continue to meet the primacy requirements it currently satisfies after the transfer of authority, powers, and duties from the state department of health to the department of environmental quality provided under S.L. 2017, ch. 199, § 75. [Contingency met in 2019]

38-14.1-04.
Powers and duties of the commission relative to designation of lands unsuitable for surface coal mining operations.

The commission has the following powers and duties:

To be responsible for surface coal mining lands review.

To develop a database and an inventory system which will permit proper evaluation of the capacity of different land areas of the state to support and permit reclamation of surface coal mining operations.

To develop a method or methods for implementing land use planning decisions concerning surface coal mining operations.

To develop procedures ensuring proper notice, opportunities for public participation, including a public hearing prior to making a designation or redesignation, pursuant to this chapter.

To develop procedures whereby determinations of the unsuitability of land for surface coal mining, as provided for in this chapter, are integrated as closely as possible with land use planning and regulation processes at the state and local levels.

To develop a planning process in order to designate which, if any, land areas are unsuitable for all or certain types of surface coal mining operations, providing said decisions are based upon competent and scientifically sound data and information and accomplished pursuant to the procedures of sections 38-14.1-05 and 38-14.1-06.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1.

38-14.1-04.1.
Reclamation research advisory committee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 321, § 1.

38-14.1-04.2.
Advisory committee responsibilities. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 321, § 1.

38-14.1-04.3.
Reclamation research objectives. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 321, § 1.

38-14.1-05.
Areas unsuitable for all or certain surface coal mining operations.

Upon petition pursuant to section 38-14.1-06, the commission shall designate an area as unsuitable for all or certain types of surface coal mining operations if the commission determines, after hearings conducted in accordance with this chapter, that reclamation pursuant to the requirements of this chapter is not technologically and economically feasible.

Upon petition pursuant to section 38-14.1-06, and after hearings conducted in accordance with this chapter, the commission may designate an area as unsuitable for certain types of surface coal mining operations if such operations will:

Be incompatible with existing state or local land use plans or programs;

Affect fragile or historic lands in which such operations could result in significant damage to important historic, cultural, scientific, and aesthetic values and natural systems;

Affect renewable resource lands in which such operations could result in a substantial loss or reduction of productivity of long-range water supply or food or fiber products, and such lands include aquifers and aquifer recharge areas; or

Affect natural hazard lands in which such operations could substantially endanger life and property, and such lands include areas subject to frequent flooding and areas of unstable geology.

Prior to designating any land area as unsuitable for surface coal mining operations, the commission shall prepare a detailed statement on:

The potential coal or commercial leonardite resources of the area;

The demand for coal or commercial leonardite resources; and

The impact of such designation on the environment, the economy, and the supply of coal or commercial leonardite.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 2015, ch. 257, § 8, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 8 of chapter 257, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

38-14.1-06.
Right to petition — Notice and hearing — Right to intervene.

Any person having an interest which is or may be adversely affected, including state agencies other than the commission, has the right to petition the commission to hold a hearing for the purpose of having an area designated as unsuitable for surface coal mining operations, or to have such designation terminated. Such petition must contain allegations of facts with supporting evidence which would tend to establish the allegations.

Prior to designating an area as unsuitable for surface coal mining operations and within ten months after receipt of a complete petition pursuant to subsection 1, the commission shall hold a public hearing in the locality of the affected area.

Notice of the hearing must be published in the official newspaper of each county wherein the affected area lies and in other daily newspapers of general circulation in the locality of the affected area at least once a week for four successive weeks prior to the hearing. The names and post-office addresses of surface and subsurface mineral rights owners must be determined as specified by the commission from the records of the county recorder in each affected county. Notice of the hearing must be sent by certified mail to the owners of surface rights and subsurface mineral rights in the affected area and to the county auditor of each county wherein such area lies no later than two weeks prior to the date of the hearing.

After a person having an interest which is or may be adversely affected has filed a petition and before the hearing, as required by this section, any person may intervene by filing allegations of facts with supporting evidence which would tend to establish the allegations.

Within sixty days after the hearing, the commission shall issue and furnish to all petitioners and any other party to the hearing a written decision regarding the petition and reasons therefor.

In the event that all petitioners stipulate agreement prior to the requested hearing, and withdraw their request, such hearing need not be held.

If petitions are filed on lands adjacent to or in close proximity to each other, hearings required by each petition may be consolidated by the commission.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

38-14.1-07.
Mining is prohibited.

After August 3, 1977, and subject to valid existing rights, no surface coal mining operations except those which existed on August 3, 1977, may be permitted:

On any lands within the boundaries of units of the North Dakota state park system, the national park system, the national wildlife refuge systems, the national system of trails, the national wilderness preservation system, the national wild and scenic rivers system, including study rivers designated under section 5(a) of the Wild and Scenic Rivers Act [Pub. L. 90-542; 82 Stat. 906; 16 U.S.C. 1271 et seq.] and national recreation areas designated by Act of the Congress of the United States.

On any federal lands within the boundaries of any national forest unless the requirements of 30 U.S.C. 1272(e)(2) are met.

Within three hundred feet [91.44 meters] of any publicly owned park or places included in the state historic sites registry or the national register of historic places unless approved jointly by the commission and the federal, state, or local agency with jurisdiction over the park or the historic site.

Within one hundred feet [30.48 meters] of the outside right-of-way line of any public road, except where mine access roads or haulage roads join such right-of-way line and except that the commission with the approval of the proper authority may permit such roads to be relocated or the area affected to lie within one hundred feet [30.48 meters] of such road, if after public notice and the opportunity for public hearing in the locality a written finding is made by the proper authority that the interests of the public and the landowners affected thereby will be protected.

Within five hundred feet [152.4 meters] of any occupied dwelling unless approved by the owner thereof, nor within three hundred feet [91.44 meters] of any public building, school, church, community, or institutional building, or within one hundred feet [30.48 meters] of a cemetery.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 1981, ch. 372, § 1; 1985, ch. 406, § 1.

Collateral References.

Construction and Application of Wild and Scenic Rivers Act (WSRA), 16 U.S.C.S. §§ 1271 to 1287,. 71 A.L.R. Fed. 2d 373.

38-14.1-08.
Mineral exploration not prohibited.

The designation of an area as unsuitable for all or certain types of surface coal mining operations does not prevent the mineral exploration of such an area.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1.

38-14.1-09.
Unsuitable lands — Savings provision.

The requirements and provisions of this chapter dealing with designation of lands unsuitable for all or certain types of surface coal mining operations (sections 38-14.1-04 through 38-14.1-08) do not apply:

To lands on which surface coal mining operations are being conducted on July 1, 1979, or under a permit issued pursuant to this chapter.

To lands where substantial legal and financial commitments in surface coal mining operations were in existence prior to January 4, 1977.

To lands where a permit application has been filed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and the petition to have an area designated as unsuitable for surface coal mining operations has not been filed within thirty days of the last publication of the notice required by subsection 1 of section 38-14.1-18.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1.

38-14.1-10.
Necessity of permit — Exception.

It is unlawful for any operator to engage in surface coal mining operations without first obtaining from the commission a permit to do so. All existing surface coal mining operations must on July 1, 1979, comply with this chapter and all rules adopted under the chapter, except that lands from which the coal has been removed before July 1, 1979, are governed by the reclamation standards that were in effect at the time of coal removal from the lands. A person or operator shall engage in the inventorying and evaluation of cultural resources upon compliance with section 55-03-01 and may implement a cultural resource mitigation plan approved by the director of the state historical society before applying for or receiving an approved surface coal mining and reclamation permit.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 1985, ch. 409, § 2; 2001, ch. 503, § 4.

38-14.1-11.
Reapplication for permit under approved state program.

No later than two months following approval of the state program in accordance with the requirements of section 503 of the federal Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 [Pub. L. 95-87; 91 Stat. 470; 30 U.S.C. 1253], regardless of litigation contesting that approval, all permittees who expect to continue to conduct surface coal mining operations after the expiration of eight months from the approval of such state program shall file an application with the commission for a new permit in accordance with the requirements of section 38-14.1-13. Such application must cover those lands to be surface mined after the expiration of eight months from the approval of the state program. The commission shall process such applications and grant or deny a permit within eight months after the date of approval of the state program.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1.

38-14.1-12.
Permits — Term — Termination.

All permits for surface coal mining and reclamation operations must comply with the standards of this chapter, any regulations promulgated thereunder, and such other requirements as the commission shall establish.

All permits issued pursuant to the requirements of this chapter must be issued for a term not to exceed five years; provided, that if the applicant demonstrates that a specified longer term is reasonably needed to allow the applicant to obtain necessary financing for equipment and the opening of the operation and if the application is full and complete for such specified longer term, the commission may grant a permit for such longer term.

A permit terminates if the permittee has not commenced the surface coal mining operations covered by such permit within three years of the issuance of the permit, provided that:

The commission may grant reasonable extensions of time upon a showing that such extensions are necessary by reason of litigation precluding such commencement or threatening substantial economic loss to the permittee, or by reason of conditions beyond the control and without the fault or negligence of the permittee.

With respect to coal to be mined for use in a synthetic fuel facility or specific major electric generating facility, the permittee must be deemed to have commenced surface coal mining operations at such time as the construction of the synthetic fuel or generating facility is initiated.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1.

38-14.1-13.
Permit applications — General requirements.

Any person or operator desiring to engage in surface coal mining operations shall make written application to the commission for a permit. Application for such permit must be made upon a form furnished by the commission. Included in the application must be:

A bond or security to attach to the lands for which a permit is sought from and after the time a permit is granted pursuant to the requirements of section 38-14.1-16.

A nonrefundable filing fee of five hundred dollars, plus ten dollars for each acre [.40 hectare] included in the permit application.

Mining and reclamation plans and other information required to be submitted pursuant to section 38-14.1-14.

An extended mining plan as required by section 38-14.1-15.

Each applicant for a surface coal mining and reclamation permit shall file a copy of the applicant’s application for public inspection with the office of the county auditor for each county where the mining is proposed to occur.

Upon request by the permit applicant, the commission, in its discretion, may designate specific information included in the plans required by subdivisions c and d of subsection 1 as exempt from disclosure under section 44-04-18, provided such specific information pertains only to the analysis of the chemical and physical properties of the coal or commercial leonardite (excepting information regarding such mineral or elemental contents which is potentially toxic in the environment). Each request must be accompanied by a statement specifying the need for nondisclosure, which statement must be considered part of the permit application to be filed for public inspection as specified in subsection 2. The confidential information is exempt for a period not to exceed ten years subsequent to the date on which the request for nondisclosure was filed, unless it is demonstrated by the permit applicant that such period should be further extended in order to prevent possible resulting harm to the permit applicant, or the applicant’s successors and assigns.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 1981, ch. 369, § 3; 1983, ch. 409, § 1; 2015, ch. 257, § 9, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 9 of chapter 257, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.